Utah statutes.
48-2c-505.   Interpretation and enforcement.

Any action to interpret, apply, or enforce the provisions of a company's articles of organization or operating agreement, or the duties, obligations, or liabilities between and among a company, its members and managers, or the rights or powers of, or restrictions on, the company, the members or managers, may be brought in the district court where the designated office of the company is located or, if the company fails to maintain a designated office, then in the district court of Salt Lake County.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

